Louisiana, session 2026, HB1120.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:854 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§854. Declaration of intent and purpose of Chapter
A. It is the intent and purpose of this Chapter to levy an excise tax on all
cigars, cigarettes, smokeless tobacco, vapor products including electronic cigarettes,
and smoking tobacco, as defined in this Chapter, sold, used, consumed, handled, or
distributed in this state, except as provided in R.S. 47:855, and to collect same from
the dealer who first sells, uses, consumes, handles, or distributes the same in the state
of Louisiana.
B. It is further the intent and purpose of this Chapter that, except as provided
in R.S. 47:855, where a dealer gives away cigars, cigarettes, smokeless tobacco,
vapor products including electronic cigarettes, or smoking tobacco for advertising
or any other purpose whatsoever, the products shall be taxed in the same manner as
if they were sold, used, consumed, handled, or distributed in this state.
C. It is further the intent and purpose of this Chapter to levy excise taxes on
all cigars, cigarettes, smokeless tobacco, vapor products including electronic
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2694 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1120
cigarettes, and smoking tobacco, as defined in this Chapter, in a risk-proportionate
manner, taking into account the relative risks of the product, including whether the
United States Food and Drug Administration has determined it to be a modified risk
tobacco product.
D. At no time shall there be any distribution of free samples of cigarettes, as
defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and the Tobacco Control Act,
consistent with 21 CFR 1140.16, and all applicable federal laws and regulations.
Furthermore, distribution of free samples of smokeless tobacco, as defined in the
Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and the Tobacco Control Act, shall be
permitted only pursuant to all applicable federal laws and regulations.